Mississippi statutes. Title 77. Public Utilities and Carriers
Article 5. Express Companies.

§ 77-9-601.
Only chartered express companies to do business of common carriers.

It shall be unlawful for any person or persons, whether residents or non-residents of this state, or any partnership, association or society of persons, resident or non-resident in this state, except express companies duly chartered as such by the laws of this state or some other state of the United States, to engage in the business of a common carrier by express over or upon any railroad or railroads or steamboat within this state. However, nothing herein contained shall apply to the carrying by express goods shipped from points without this state to points within this state, or from points within this state to points without this state, or through or across this state.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 4898; Hemingway’s 1917, § 7682; 1930, § 7050; 1942, § 7826.

§ 77-9-603.
Penalty for violation.

If any person, partnership, association or society of persons or any agent or representative of such person, partnership, association or society shall, in violation of Section 77-9-601, engage in such business within this state, or shall receive for transportation by express or transport or carry or assist in such transportation or delivery, such person or persons shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and, on conviction, shall, for each offense, be fined in any amount not exceeding one thousand dollars, or be imprisoned not exceeding three months, or both.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 4899; Hemingway’s 1917, § 7683; 1930, § 7051; 1942, § 7827.

§ 77-9-605.
Offices of express companies.

Every express company shall establish and maintain offices for the transaction of business with the public in its capacity as a common carrier, at each city, town, and village convenient to its routes, if, in the opinion of the commission, the public convenience and necessity requires it. An office once established shall not be discontinued without the consent of the commission, which has authority to require such a company to establish and maintain offices.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 4328; 1906, § 4882; Hemingway’s 1917, § 7669; 1930, § 7057; 1942, § 7833; Laws, 1908, ch. 80; Laws, 2018, ch. 332, § 17, eff from and after passage (approved March 8, 2018).

§ 77-9-607.
Civil liability of express companies.

If any express company, through any agent or employee, shall demand and receive of a consignee any charge or part of a charge which had been prepaid, or a greater sum than the company had agreed to perform the services for, or more than reasonable compensation for any service rendered, the consignee or person paying the overcharge shall be entitled to recover of the company twenty-five dollars, in addition to damages for any injury.

Any package, which the company shall receive and transport marked “paid” or “pd.,” or otherwise so marked as to indicate prepayment, shall not be charged for at the point of delivery, under the same penalty.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 4327; 1906, § 4881; Hemingway’s 1917, § 7668; 1930, § 7094; 1942, § 7870; Laws, 1908, chs. 77, 79.